Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.189

Retirement allowance—Adjustment eligibility.

(1) A retiree who receives state-funded long-term care services on or after June 1, 1998, is not eligible for the increase provided by section 8, chapter 340, Laws of 1998, if the increase would make the retiree ineligible for state-funded long-term care services. For the purposes of this section "state-funded long-term care services" means a state-funded adult family home, adult residential care, assisted living, enhanced adult residential care, in-home care, or nursing home service, as defined in RCW 74.39A.009, for which the retiree is required to contribute all income other than a specified amount reserved for the retiree's personal maintenance needs. Retirees who are subject to this section shall notify the department in writing. The department has no affirmative duty to identify retirees who are subject to this subsection.

(2) This section applies to all payments under section 8, chapter 340, Laws of 1998, made on or after May 17, 1999, regardless of the date of retirement.

[ 1999 c 362 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 362 s 3: "Section 3 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 17, 1999]." [ 1999 c 362 s 4.]